Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2001
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2001 to 76-2008 shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Statutory Rule Against Perpetuities Act.

Laws 1989, LB 377, § 1.